dev/verbs-apertium-kaz-tat.tat.lexc
LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYSI

кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<nom%>:кайсы CLIT ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>:кайсының CLIT ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:кайсына CLIT ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:кайсын CLIT ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:кайсыннан CLIT ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:кайсында CLIT ;

кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<px%>:кайсынікі%{n%} CASE ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>: POSS-REAL ; ! кайсысы, кайсыбыз, кайсыгыз

кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<pl%>:кайсылар CASE-ETC ;
кайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:кайсылары%{n%} CASE ;
! ^ кайсылары(б/г)ыз are rare but possible in Tatar, so maybe these forms should
! be included too /IS/

LEXICON PRON-ITG-NINDI

! Might be not complete (қандайларығыз? and possessive stuff in general)

нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:нинди CLIT ;
! ^ FIXME Similative form of demonstrative pronouns should receive an alternati-
! ve continuation with CLIT too. Consider e,g.: "Ең жақсы Интернет қандай?" Here
! it shouldn't receive <nom> tag I think /IS/
нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:нинди CASE ;
нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:ниндие%{n%} CASE ;
нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:ниндиләр CASE ;
нинди%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:ниндиләрен%{n%} CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG

PRON-ITG-QAYSI ;
PRON-ITG-NINDI ;
ни:ни PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
нимә:нимә PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "(dial.) what"
нәрсә:нәрсә PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
кем:кем PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex

LEXICON PRNNEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

CASE-ETC ;
%<adv%>:чә CLIT ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

! FIXME JNW please have a look at this
! Listing all forms here because of overgeneration with *өздерім,
! *өздеріміз, *өзіңдер etc while linking to POSS-REAL. This was the idea.
! Now they are handled more like personal pronouns (the same tags in the same
! order), so they should pass transfer without any trouble.
!-----
! A remaining problem with reflexive pronoun is that it takes personal copula
! suffixes "selectively": e.g. prn.refl.px1sg would take only cop.px1sg
! (prn.ref.px3sp seems to take all of them though).
! A little bit of overgeneration won't hurt anyone :), but I think that odd
! forms could be filtered out somehow later. Don't know how to do it./04Aug, IS/

! FIXME DISCUSS Write full forms for the lower side and put only PRON-DEF in the
! Root Lexicon

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;

! This is how it was before:
!%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSS-REAL ;
!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSS-REAL ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     DETERMINERS

LEXICON DETDEMLEX

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ; 

LEXICON DETQNTLEX 

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ; 

LEXICON DETINDLEX

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ; 

LEXICON DETITGLEX

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ; 

LEXICON DETNEGLEX

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PART-OF-SPEECH LEXICONS

LEXICON NLEX

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX ! consider "N2" for the name
                      ! equiv of kir:LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND
                      ! FIXME:NOTE: check this, leads to foo bar\/foo barсы :)
                      ! It turned out to be because of ^CASE-ETC ; in POSS-REAL cont.class
                      ! It will be fixed soon

%<n%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;
%<n%>: POSS-REAL ;     ! for stuff like "біздің ауа райымыз" and even "оның ауа райы", which should have a <px3sp> analysis

LEXICON NAT
! Nationalites

!A1 ;              ! nationality's adjectival form, e.g. "Turkish [food]" ! Consider <n.attr> reading for this 
NLEX ;              ! a member of the nationality, e.g. "A Turk"
:%>ш%{A%} ADVLEX ;   ! as / in the style of the nat., e.g. "à la Turk"
!:%>ш%{A%} ADVLEX ;   ! in the language of the nationality, e.g. "in Turkish" ! I guess ADJ was meant /I.S./
:%>ш%{A%} NLEX ;    ! the language of the nationality, e.g. "Turkish"

LEXICON NPTOPLEX

%<np%>%<top%>: N-INFL-COMMON  ; ! FIXME:NOTE: this cont.class might lead to some overgeneration
                                ! *Мәскәүдәй?             

LEXICON NPANTMLEX

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPANTFLEX

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев, -ин
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: CASE ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а CASE ; 

LEXICON NPCOGFLEX

! This isn't used at the moment,
! but e.g. ?Polish cognoms ending with -ска would take this cont.class /I.S./ 

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPCOGMFLEX

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPORGLEX

%<np%>%<org%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPALLEX

%<np%>%<al%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NUMLEX

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} SUBST ;
%<num%>%<dist%>:%>%{A%}р SUBST ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NUM-ITG ! This is a temporal solution
                ! (could be integrated with the above)

%<num%>%<itg%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} SUBST ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<dist%>:%>%{A%}р SUBST ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<num%>%<coll%>: # ;

!LEXICON DIGITLEX
!
!%<num%>: # ; 

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON POSTLEX

%<post%>: CLIT ; 

LEXICON POSTADVLEX

%<postadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON ADVITGLEX

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ; 

LEXICON ADVLEX

%<adv%>: CLIT ; 

LEXICON CCLEX

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CSLEX

%<cnjsub%>: # ; 

LEXICON CALEX

%<cnjadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON QSTLEX

%<qst%>: # ; 

LEXICON MOD-ASS

%<mod_ass%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR 

%<abbr%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


!======================!
 LEXICON ModalParticles
!======================!


! FIXME: consider "әле" and "әллә"
!
! #1 "әле" after imperative and optative forms has a meaning somewhat similar to
!     Russian "-ка" (e.g. "скажи-ка") - e.g. "әйт әле", "кайтыйк әле";           ?>> <mod_foc>
! #2 Нәрсә булды соң әле? = Что же случилось?
! 
! #4 Күрешербез әле. = Еще увидимся.
!
! #3 Әле кичә генә. = Еще вчера; Только вчера.
! 
! But if for all above examples "әлі <-> әле" translation works, distinguishing between the meanings
! might be not needed, we'll just have to choose an appropriate tag.
!-----
! "әллә" can appear both before and after the word it is related to:
! 
! #1 "- Абау, миңа әллә нәрсә булган!"
! #2 "Канатлы дигәч тә, мин кошмы әллә?" 
!-------------------------------------------------------------------

! Question modal particles
!=========================
 
мы:мы QSTLEX ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/RL
мы:ме QSTLEX ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/LR

! Actually Tatar question modal particle is written with no space before it (read separately),
! but there are sentences like the following (although not that much I guess):
!# "Яңача түләү яки һәрвакыттагыча "Хотели как лучше, получилось как всегда"мы?" 
! Just having a space before it while treating it as a clitic wouldn't work /I.S./

микән:микән QSTLEX ; ! originated from "-мы икән"

! Assertive (emphasizing) modal particles
!========================================

бит:бит MOD-ASS ;
ич:ич MOD-ASS ;
ласа:ласа MOD-ASS ;
ләбаса:ләбаса MOD-ASS ;
ләбаса:лабаса MOD-ASS ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON Copula

!и:и COP-I ; ! ""
COP-I ; ! ""

LEXICON Numerals 
ике:ике NUMLEX ; ! ""
алты:алты NUMLEX ; ! ""
ун:ун NUMLEX ; ! ""
ундүрт:ундүрт NUMLEX ; ! ""
унсигез:унсигез NUMLEX ; ! ""
кырык:кырык NUMLEX ; ! ""
сиксән:сиксән NUMLEX ; ! ""
төмән:төмән NUMLEX ; ! "archaic for 10 000"
биш:бишәү NUM-COLL ;
ике:икәү NUM-COLL ;
өч:өчәү NUM-COLL ;
дүрт:дүртәү NUM-COLL ;
биш:бишәү NUM-COLL ;
алтау:алтау NUM-COLL ;
җидәү:җидәү NUM-COLL ;
III NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
V NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
ничә:ничә NUM-ITG ;
 LEXICON Nouns
аш:аш NLEX ; ! ""
бронза:бронза NLEX ; ! ""
дуңгыз% баласы:дуңгыз% бала N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
зыян:зыян NLEX ; ! ""
кәҗә% бәтие:кәҗә% бәти N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
кораб:кораб NLEX ; ! ""
кош% баласы:кош% бала N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT 
куян% баласы:куян% бала N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
ноябрь:ноябрь NLEX ; ! ""
спорт:спорт NLEX ; ! ""
сыену% урыны:сыену% урын N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
тору% урыны:тору% урын N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" Use/MT
тынлык:тынлык NLEX ; ! ""
чыгым:чыгым NLEX ; ! ""
яр% буе:яр% буй N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
гарәп:гарәп NAT ; ! "Arab"
инглиз:инглиз NAT ; ! "English"
карел:карел NAT ; ! ""
кытай:кытай NAT ; ! "Chinese"
нимес:нимес NAT ; ! "German"
төрек:төрек NAT ; ! "Turkish"
фарсы:фарсы NAT ; ! "Persian"
чуваш:чуваш NAT ; ! "Chuvash"
 LEXICON ProperNouns 
Маңгыстау:Маңгыстау NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Ярмәкәй:Ярмәкәй NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Бразилия:Бразилия NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Казакъстан:Казахстан NPTOPLEX ; ! "Kazakhstan" Dir/LR
Словения:Словения NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Согуд% Гарәпстаны:Согуд% Гарәпстан N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
Варшава:Варшава NPTOPLEX ; ! "Warsaw"
Пхеньян:Пхеньян NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Герат:Герат NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Алпамыс:Алпамыс NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Альбина:Альбина NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Асия:Асия NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Бакытжан:Бакытжан NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Галина:Галина NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Гүлнәр:Гүлнәр NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Джеймс:Джеймс NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Елена:Елена NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Җанибәк:Җанибәк NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Катя:Катя NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Леонид:Леонид NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Надежда:Надежда NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Нурсолтан:Нурсолтан NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Светлана:Светлана NPANTFLEX ; ! ""
Сәрсенбай:Сәрсенбай NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Юрий:Юрий NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Бабич:Бабич NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Бурсик:Бурсик NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Гиффен:Гиффен NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Әл%-Фараби:Әл%-Фараби NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Ли:Ли NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Обама:Обама NPCOGMFLEX ;
Сюй:Сюй NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Ющенко:Ющенко NPCOGMFLEX ; ! ""
Ахметов:Ахметов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Болтаев:Болтаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Данилов:Данилов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Әбләҗев:Әбләҗев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Кишинев:Кишинев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Мидуков:Мидуков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Рафиков:Рафиков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Тиесов:Тиесов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Әүбәкирова:Әүбәкирова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Байкова:Байкова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Баталова:Баталова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Башкортова:Башкортова NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Биишева:Биишева NPCOGFLEX ; ! ""
Consolidated% Contractors% Company:Consolidated% Contractors% Company NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Freedom% House:Freedom% House NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Investment:Investment NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Kazakhmys% Plc:Kazakhmys% Plc NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Plc:Plc NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Амнести% Интернэшнл:Амнести% Интернэшнл NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Жайыкмунайгаз:Жайыкмунайгаз NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Темелин:Темелин NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Independent:Independent NPALLEX ; ! ""
Petroleum:Petroleum NPALLEX ; ! ""
Witness:Witness NPALLEX ; ! ""
Время:Время NPALLEX ; ! ""
Жуңгар:Жуңгар NPALLEX ; ! ""
Кайнозой:кайнозой NPALLEX ; ! ""
Самрук:Самрук NPALLEX ; ! ""
Фунтик:Фунтик NPALLEX ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs 
кайда:кайда ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
кайдан:кайдан ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
кайчан:кайчан ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
кая:кая ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
ничек:ничек ADVITGLEX ; ! "how"
ни% өчен:ни% өчен ADVITGLEX ; ! "why,what for" Use/MT
никадәр:никадәр ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
алдан:алдан ADVLEX ; ! "at first"
бераз:бераз ADVLEX ; ! "a little" FIXME:NOTE: also a quantifier -->"
былтыр:былтыр ADVLEX ; ! "last year"
әле:әле ADVLEX ; ! "now"
күмәртәләп:күмәртәләп ADVLEX ; ! ""
тик:тик ADVLEX ; ! "only" FIXME:NOTE: also added as conj. -->"
элек:элек ADVLEX ; ! "earlier"
 LEXICON Abbreviations
KZ:KZ ABBR ; ! ""
БТА:БТА ABBR ; ! "a bank in Kazakhstan"
Ембемунайгаз:Ембемунайгаз ABBR ; ! ""
МАГАТЭ:МАГАТЭ ABBR ; ! ""
ССРБ:ССРБ ABBR ; ! "USSR"
ЭЧ:ЭЧ ABBR ; ! ""
км³:км³ ABBR ;  ! "km³"
т%.:т%. ABBR ; ! "солтүстік,төньяк,north" FIXME:CHECK -->"
